Nevada, session 83, SB499.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 322.063 is hereby amended to read as follows:
322.063 1. The Administrator of the Division of State Lands
of the State Department of Conservation and Natural Resources, as
ex officio State Land Registrar, may, pursuant to NRS 322.060,
lease residential property owned by the State of Nevada for less than
the fair market value of the property to an officer or employee of
this State [who] if:
(a) The officer or employee is required as a condition of his or
her employment to reside in residential property owned by this
State.
(b) A state agency that manages residential property owned by
this State determines that it is beneficial to the State of Nevada for
the officer or employee to reside in the residential property.
2. Before residential property may be leased pursuant to this
section, the State Land Registrar, in cooperation with the head of the
state agency that manages the property, must approve the lease and
determine the amount of rent for the lease of the property.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
3. The State Land Registrar may waive any fee for the
consideration of an application to lease property pursuant to this
section.
4. Any money collected by a state agency as rent for the lease
of residential property pursuant to this section must be accounted
for separately by the state agency and used for the operation and
maintenance of residential property owned by this State that is
managed by the state agency.
5. Any money collected by a state agency as rent for the lease
of residential property pursuant to this section that is remaining at
the end of a fiscal year does not revert to the State General Fund
and the balance of that money must be carried forward to the next
fiscal year.
Sec. 2. Chapter 353 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. If the Director of the State Department of Conservation
and Natural Resources determines that, because of delays in the
receipt of revenue for services billed to the Federal Government,
local governments and other state governments, the amount of
current claims for expenses incurred in the suppression of fires or
response to emergencies exceeds the amount of money available to
pay such claims within 30 days, the Director may request from the
Director of the Office of Finance a temporary advance from the
State General Fund.
2. The Director of the Office of Finance shall provide written
notification to the State Controller and to the Senate and Assembly
Fiscal Analysts of the Fiscal Analysis Division of the Legislative
Counsel Bureau if the Director approves a request made pursuant
to subsection 1. The State Controller shall draw his or her warrant
upon receipt of such a notification.
3. Such an advance from the State General Fund:
(a) May be approved by the Director of the Office of Finance
only for expenses incurred in the suppression of fires or response
to emergencies. Before approving the advance, the Director of the
Office of Finance shall verify that billings for reimbursement have
been sent to the Federal Government, local governments or other
state governments responsible for reimbursing the Division of
Forestry for costs incurred in activities relating to the suppression
of fires or response to emergencies.
(b) Is limited to the total amount due from outstanding billings
for reimbursable expenses incurred in the suppression of fires or
response to emergencies as approved for payment to the State by
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 4 –
agencies of the Federal Government, local governments and other
state governments.
4. Any money which is temporarily advanced from the State
General Fund to the Department pursuant to this section must be
repaid on or before the last business day in August immediately
following the end of the fiscal year in which the temporary
advance was approved.
Sec. 3. Chapter 472 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. The Out-of-State Fire Suppression Account is hereby
created in the State General Fund.
2. The Account must be administered by the State Forester
Firewarden.
3. All money received by the Division of Forestry of the State
Department of Conservation and Natural Resources as
reimbursement to the State of Nevada for response to a fire that
does not start on or spread to land in this State or for response to
an emergency that occurs outside this State must be deposited in
the Account.
4. The interest and income earned on money in the Account,
after deducting any applicable charges, must be credited to the
Account.
5. Money in the Account may be used only for the costs
incurred by the State of Nevada for response to a fire that does not
start on or spread to land in this State or for response to an
emergency that occurs outside this State.
6. Any money in the Account remaining at the end of a fiscal
year does not revert to the State General Fund, and the balance in
the Account must be carried forward to the next fiscal year.
Sec. 4. NRS 527.230 is hereby amended to read as follows:
527.230 1. [All] The Division of Forestry Account is hereby
created in the State General Fund.
2. In addition to the money deposited pursuant to NRS
209.231 and 472.050, all moneys received by the State Forester for
the purposes of :
(a) NRS 527.130 to 527.230, inclusive, including , without
limitation, all moneys collected pursuant to NRS 527.200 [, shall] ;
and
(b) NRS 527.260 to 527.300, inclusive, including, without
limitation, all moneys collected from the issuance of special
permits pursuant to NRS 527.270,
 must be deposited in the Division of Forestry Account [.
2.] and accounted for separately.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 5 –
3. Costs of administration of NRS 527.130 to 527.230,
inclusive, [shall] and 527.260 to 527.300, inclusive, must be paid
from the Division of Forestry Account on claims presented by the
State Forester in the manner other claims against the State are paid.
[3.] 4. No moneys received [pursuant to subsection 1 shall] for
the purposes of NRS 527.130 to 527.230, inclusive, or 527.260 to
527.300, inclusive, may be used for any purpose except to carry out
the provisions of NRS 527.130 to 527.230, inclusive [.] , or 527.260
to 527.300, inclusive, as applicable.
5. Any money received for the purposes of NRS 527.130 to
527.230, inclusive, or 527.260 to 527.300, inclusive, that is
remaining in the Account at the end of the fiscal year does not
revert to the State General Fund, and the balance of that money
must be carried forward to the next fiscal year.
Sec. 5. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the Out-of-State Fire Suppression Account created by
section 3 of this act the sum of $27,359,038.
Sec. 6. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)